Tennessee, session 114, HB2504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-120, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(j) In determining the appropriate sentence for a defendant, the sentencing court
shall determine whether the defendant is required to be sentenced as a repeat violent
offender under this section or § 40-35-125. If the defendant is required to be sentenced
as a repeat violent offender under only one (1) such statute, then the court shall
sentence the defendant pursuant to the statute that requires sentencing as a repeat
violent offender. If the defendant is required to be sentenced as a repeat violent
offender under both statutes, then the defendant shall be sentenced pursuant to this
section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 35, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
40-35-125.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Prior conviction":
(A) Means the defendant was convicted of a violent offense that
occurred on or after July 1, 2026, but before the violent offense for which
the defendant is to be sentenced; provided, however, that a defendant
who was convicted of multiple violent offenses based on conduct that
HB2504
010232
- 1 -

occurred contemporaneously, occurred at the same location, and
represented a single continuous criminal episode with a single criminal
intent shall only be considered to have a prior conviction for the offense
that would result in the highest point allocation pursuant to this section;
(B) Does not include a finding or adjudication that the defendant
committed an act as a juvenile that is designated as a violent offense if
committed by an adult, unless the defendant was tried as an adult in
criminal court pursuant to § 37-1-134 or § 37-1-191, or similar statutes of
other states or jurisdictions, and was convicted of the violent offense in a
criminal court and sentenced as an adult; and
(C) Includes convictions under the laws of any other state,
government, or country that, if committed in this state, would have
constituted a violent offense. If a felony from another jurisdiction is not a
named violent offense and if the elements of the felony are the same as a
violent offense, then the offense shall be considered a prior conviction;
(2) "Repeat violent offender" means a defendant who is convicted of a
violent offense, which occurred on or after July 1, 2026, and the combination of
the strikes allocated pursuant to this section for the violent offense and the
defendant's prior convictions equals three (3) or more strikes; provided, however,
that at least two (2) of the strikes must be for offenses listed in subdivision
(a)(3)(A); and
(3) "Violent offense" means any of the following offenses when
committed on or after July 1, 2026:
(A) The following offenses, each of which results in the defendant
receiving one (1) strike:
- 2 - 010232

(i) Female genital mutilation, as defined in § 39-13-110;
(ii) Domestic assault, as defined in § 39-13-111, when the
offense is a felony offense;
(iii) Grave torture, as defined in § 39-13-117, if the
defendant was a juvenile at the time of the offense and was
convicted in criminal court and sentenced as an adult;
(iv) Second degree murder, as defined in § 39-13-210;
(v) Vehicular homicide, as defined in § 39-13-213(a)(2);
(vi) Aggravated vehicular homicide, as defined in § 39-13-
218;
(vii) Aggravated kidnapping, as defined in § 39-13-304;
(viii) Especially aggravated kidnapping, as defined in § 39-
13-305;
(ix) Trafficking for a commercial sex act, as defined in §
39-13-309;
(x) Advertising commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as
defined in § 39-13-315;
(xi) Aggravated human trafficking, as defined in § 39-13-
316;
(xii) Aggravated robbery, as defined in § 39-13-402;
(xiii) Especially aggravated robbery, as defined in § 39-13-
403;
(xiv) Carjacking, as defined in § 39-13-404;
(xv) Aggravated rape, as defined in § 39-13-502;
(xvi) Rape, as defined in § 39-13-503;
- 3 - 010232

(xvii) Aggravated sexual battery, as defined in § 39-13-
504;
(xviii) Sexual battery, as defined in § 39-13-505;
(xix) Aggravated statutory rape, as defined in § 39-13-
506(c);
(xx) Aggravated rape of a child, as defined in § 39-13-531,
if the defendant was a juvenile at the time of the offense and was
convicted in criminal court and sentenced as an adult;
(xxi) Especially aggravated rape, as defined in § 39-13-
534, if the defendant was a juvenile at the time of the offense and
was convicted in criminal court and sentenced as an adult;
(xxii) Especially aggravated rape of a child, as defined in §
39-13-535, if the defendant was a juvenile at the time of the
offense and was convicted in criminal court and sentenced as an
adult;
(xxiii) Indecent exposure, as defined in § 39-13-511, when
the offense is a felony offense;
(xxiv) Patronizing prostitution, as defined in § 39-13-
514(b)(3);
(xxv) Promoting prostitution, as defined in § 39-13-515;
(xxvi) Public indecency, as defined in § 39-13-517, when
the offense is a felony offense;
(xxvii) Continuous sexual abuse of a child, as defined in §
39-13-518;
(xxviii) Rape of a child, as defined in § 39-13-522;
- 4 - 010232

(xxix) Sexual battery by an authority figure, as defined in §
39-13-527;
(xxx) Solicitation of a minor, as defined in § 39-13-528,
when the offense is a felony offense;
(xxxi) Soliciting sexual exploitation of a minor or
exploitation of a minor by electronic means, as defined in § 39-13-
529;
(xxxii) Statutory rape by an authority figure, as defined in §
39-13-532;
(xxxiii) Promoting travel for prostitution, as defined in § 39-
13-533;
(xxxiv) Unlawful photographing in violation of privacy, as
defined in § 39-13-605, when the offense is a felony offense;
(xxxv) Observation without consent, as defined in § 39-13-
607, when the offense is a felony offense;
(xxxvi) Especially aggravated burglary, as defined in § 39-
13-1004;
(xxxvii) Aggravated arson, as defined in § 39-14-302;
(xxxviii) Incest, as defined in § 39-15-302;
(xxxix) Child abuse or child neglect or endangerment, as
defined in § 39-15-401, when the offense is a felony offense;
(xl) Aggravated child abuse or aggravated child
endangerment or neglect, as defined in § 39-15-402;
- 5 - 010232

(xli) Using a minor to produce, import, prepare, distribute,
process, or appear in obscene material, as defined in § 39-17-
902(b);
(xlii) Unlawful sale, distribution, or transportation with
intent to sell or distribute a child-like sex doll, as defined in § 39-
17-910(f);
(xliii) Sexual exploitation of a minor, as defined in § 39-17-
1003;
(xliv) Aggravated sexual exploitation of a minor, as defined
in § 39-17-1004;
(xlv) Especially aggravated sexual exploitation of a minor,
as defined in § 39-17-1005; and
(xlvi) The following offenses when the offense is a felony
offense:
(a) Facilitation, under § 39-11-403, to commit any
of the offenses listed in this subdivision (a)(3)(A) or first
degree murder, as defined in § 39-13-202;
(b) Criminal attempt, under § 39-12-101, to commit
any of the offenses listed in this subdivision (a)(3)(A) or
first degree murder, as defined in § 39-13-202;
(c) Solicitation, under § 39-12-102, to commit any
of the offenses listed in this subdivision (a)(3)(A) or first
degree murder, as defined in § 39-13-202; and
- 6 - 010232

(d) Conspiracy, under § 39-12-103, to commit any
of the offenses listed in this subdivision (a)(3)(A) or first
degree murder, as defined in § 39-13-202;
(B) The following offenses, each of which results in the defendant
receiving one-half (1/2) strike:
(i) Aggravated assault, as defined in § 39-13-
102(a)(1)(A)(iii) or § 39-13-102(a)(1)(B)(iii), if the offense involved
the use of a deadly weapon;
(ii) Aggravated assault, as defined in § 39-13-
102(a)(1)(A)(iv);
(iii) Aggravated assault, as defined in § 39-13-102, if the
offense resulted in serious bodily injury to or the death of another;
(iv) Aggravated assault against a first responder or nurse,
as defined in § 39-13-116(b)(3), if the offense involved the use of
a deadly weapon;
(v) Aggravated assault against a first responder or nurse,
as defined in § 39-13-116(b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(4);
(vi) Voluntary manslaughter, as defined in § 39-13-211;
(vii) Criminally negligent homicide, as defined in § 39-13-
212;
(viii) Vehicular homicide, as defined in § 39-13-213(a)(1),
(a)(3), or (a)(4);
(ix) Reckless homicide, as defined in § 39-13-215;
(x) Involuntary labor servitude, as defined in § 39-13-307;
- 7 - 010232

(xi) Trafficking persons for forced labor or services, as
defined in § 39-13-308;
(xii) Aggravated burglary, as defined in § 39-13-1003;
(xiii) The manufacture, delivery, or sale of a controlled
substance, as defined in § 39-17-417, where the instant offense is
classified as a Class A, B, or C felony and the person has two (2)
or more prior convictions for the manufacture, delivery, or sale of a
controlled substance classified as a Class A, B, or C felony,
pursuant to § 39-17-417, prior to or at the time of committing the
instant offense;
(xiv) Possessing or using a firearm or antique firearm
during commission of or attempt to commit a dangerous felony, as
defined in § 39-17-1324; and
(xv) Driving under the influence with six (6) prior
convictions, as defined in § 55-10-401; and
(C) The following offenses, each of which results in the defendant
receiving one-quarter (1/4) strike:
(i) Any other felony offense; and
(ii) The following offenses, when the offense is a
misdemeanor offense:
(a) Facilitation, under § 39-11-403, to commit any
of the offenses listed in subdivision (a)(3)(A);
(b) Criminal attempt, under § 39-12-101, to commit
any of the offenses listed in subdivision (a)(3)(A);
- 8 - 010232

(c) Solicitation, under § 39-12-102, to commit any
of the offenses listed in subdivision (a)(3)(A); and
(d) Conspiracy, under § 39-12-103, to commit any
of the offenses listed in subdivision (a)(3)(A).
(b) In determining the number of strikes applicable to a defendant for purposes
of sentencing pursuant to subsection (c), the court shall consider whether the defendant
has had a three-year period of time with no criminal convictions. For each three-year
period of time with no criminal convictions, the court shall deduct one-half (1/2) strike
from the defendant's total number of strikes accumulated for offenses listed in
subdivision (a)(3)(B) or (a)(3)(C).
(c) The court shall sentence a defendant who has been convicted of a violent
offense that occurred on or after July 1, 2026, and that, in combination with prior
convictions for violent offenses, results in the defendant having three (3) or more strikes,
at least two (2) of which are for offenses listed in subdivision (a)(3)(A), to imprisonment
for life if the court finds beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant is a repeat violent
offender.
(d) The finding that a defendant is or is not a repeat violent offender is
appealable by either party.
(e) In determining the appropriate sentence for a defendant, the sentencing
court shall determine whether the defendant is required to be sentenced as a repeat
violent offender under this section or § 40-35-120. If the defendant is required to be
sentenced as a repeat violent offender under only one (1) such statute, then the court
shall sentence the defendant pursuant to the statute that requires sentencing as a repeat
violent offender. If the defendant is required to be sentenced as a repeat violent
- 9 - 010232

offender under both statutes, then the defendant shall be sentenced pursuant to § 40-
35-120.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to sentencing for offenses occurring on or after that date.
- 10 - 010232